Illinois, session 104th, HB5583.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This amendatory Act of the 104th General 5Assembly may be referred to as the Criminal Justice Procedural 6Clarification Act.  7    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 8changing Section 5-6-3.6 and by adding Sections 5-6-3.6-1 and 95-6-3.6-2 as follows: 10    (730 ILCS 5/5-6-3.6)11    Sec. 5-6-3.6. First Time Weapon Offense Program.12    (a) The General Assembly has sought to promote public 13safety, reduce recidivism, and conserve valuable resources of 14the criminal justice system through the creation of diversion 15programs for non-violent offenders. Public Act 103-370 16establishes a program for first-time, non-violent offenders 17charged with certain weapons possession offenses. The General 18Assembly recognizes some persons, particularly in areas of 19high crime or poverty, may have experienced trauma that 20contributes to poor decision making skills, and the creation 21of a diversionary program poses a greater benefit to the 22community and the person than incarceration. Under this   HB5583- 2 -LRB104 17432 RLC 30857 b1program, a court, with the consent of the defendant and the 2State's Attorney, may sentence a defendant charged with an 3unlawful possession of weapons offense under Section 24-1 of 4the Criminal Code of 2012 or aggravated unlawful possession of 5a weapon offense under Section 24-1.6 of the Criminal Code of 62012, if punishable as a Class 4 felony or lower, to a First 7Time Weapon Offense Program.8    (a-1) A court may sentence a person charged with a 9violation of Section 24-1 or 24-1.6 of the Criminal Code of 102012 to probation under this Section, regardless of whether 11the State's Attorney affirmatively offers or consents to 12participation in the First Time Weapon Offense Program, if the 13defendant:14        (1) has no prior felony convictions;15        (2) has not previously participated in a program of 16    supervision or probation under this Section;17        (3) did not use, threaten to use, or discharge a 18    firearm in the commission of the offense;19        (4) did not cause bodily harm to another person; and20        (5) otherwise meets the eligibility requirements set 21    forth in this Section. 22    (b) (Blank). A defendant is not eligible for this Program 23if:24        (1) the offense was committed during the commission of 25    a violent offense as defined in subsection (h) of this 26    Section;  HB5583- 3 -LRB104 17432 RLC 30857 b1        (2) he or she has previously been convicted or placed 2    on probation or conditional discharge for any violent 3    offense under the laws of this State, the laws of any other 4    state, or the laws of the United States;5        (3) he or she had a prior successful completion of the 6    First Time Weapon Offense Program under this Section;7        (4) he or she has previously been adjudicated a 8    delinquent minor for the commission of a violent offense;9        (5) (blank); or10        (6) he or she has an existing order of protection 11    issued against him or her.12    (b-5) In considering whether a defendant shall be 13sentenced to the First Time Weapon Offense Program, the court 14shall consider the following:15        (1) the age, immaturity, or limited mental capacity of 16    the defendant;17        (2) the nature and circumstances of the offense;18        (3) whether participation in the Program is in the 19    interest of the defendant's rehabilitation, including any 20    employment or involvement in community, educational, 21    training, or vocational programs;22        (4) whether the defendant suffers from trauma, as 23    supported by documentation or evaluation by a licensed 24    professional; and25        (5) the potential risk to public safety. 26    (c) For an offense committed on or after January 1, 2018   HB5583- 4 -LRB104 17432 RLC 30857 b1(the effective date of Public Act 100-3) whenever an eligible 2person pleads guilty to an unlawful possession of weapons 3offense under Section 24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or 4aggravated unlawful possession of a weapon offense under 5Section 24-1.6 of the Criminal Code of 2012, which is 6punishable as a Class 4 felony or lower, the court, with the 7consent of the defendant and the State's Attorney, may, 8without entering a judgment, sentence the defendant to 9complete the First Time Weapon Offense Program. When a 10defendant is placed in the Program, the court shall defer 11further proceedings in the case until the conclusion of the 12period or until the filing of a petition alleging violation of 13a term or condition of the Program. A disposition of probation 14is considered to be a conviction for the purposes of imposing 15the conditions of probation and for appeal; however, a 16sentence under this Section is not a conviction for purposes 17of this Act or for purposes of disqualifications or 18disabilities imposed by law upon conviction of a crime unless 19and until judgment is entered. Upon violation of a term or 20condition of the Program, the court may enter a judgment on its 21original finding of guilt and proceed as otherwise provided by 22law. Upon fulfillment of the terms and conditions of the 23Program, the court shall discharge the person and dismiss the 24proceedings against the person.25    (c-1) The State's Attorney may object to sentencing under 26this Section only by stating on the record specific and   HB5583- 5 -LRB104 17432 RLC 30857 b1articulable public safety reasons why probation under this 2Section would be inappropriate for the individual defendant.3    (c-2) Upon objection by the State's Attorney, the court 4may sentence the defendant under this Section if the court 5makes written findings that the defendant meets the statutory 6eligibility requirements and that probation under this Section 7is consistent with public safety and the rehabilitative 8purposes of this Code.9    (c-3) A defendant shall not be deemed ineligible for 10probation under this Section solely because the defendant was 11legally ineligible to apply for a Firearm Owner's 12Identification Card, at the time of the offense, if no other 13statutory disqualifications apply. 14    (d) The Program shall be at least 6 months and not to 15exceed 24 months, as determined by the court at the 16recommendation of the Program administrator and the State's 17Attorney. The Program administrator may be appointed by the 18Chief Judge of each Judicial Circuit. 19    (e) The conditions of the Program shall be that the 20defendant:21        (1) not violate any criminal statute of this State or 22    any other jurisdiction;23        (2) refrain from possessing a firearm or other 24    dangerous weapon;25        (3) (blank);26        (4) (blank);  HB5583- 6 -LRB104 17432 RLC 30857 b1        (5) (blank);2        (6) (blank);3        (7) attend and participate in any Program activities 4    deemed required by the Program administrator, such as: 5    counseling sessions, in-person and over the phone 6    check-ins, and educational classes; and7        (8) (blank).8    (f) The Program may, in addition to other conditions, 9require that the defendant:10        (1) obtain or attempt to obtain employment;11        (2) attend educational courses designed to prepare the 12    defendant for obtaining a high school diploma or to work 13    toward passing high school equivalency testing or to work 14    toward completing a vocational training program;15        (3) refrain from having in his or her body the 16    presence of any illicit drug prohibited by the 17    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act or 18    the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, unless prescribed 19    by a physician, and submit samples of his or her blood or 20    urine or both for tests to determine the presence of any 21    illicit drug; 22        (4) perform community service;23        (5) pay all fines, assessments, fees, and costs; and24        (6) comply with such other reasonable conditions as 25    the court may impose. 26    (f-1) Upon the successful completion of the Program, a   HB5583- 7 -LRB104 17432 RLC 30857 b1defendant may submit an application for a Firearm Owner's 2Identification Card upon receiving a court order demonstrating 3completion of the Program. The Illinois State Police shall 4issue a Firearm Owner's Identification Card to such person 5upon receiving a court order demonstrating completion of the 6Program if the person is otherwise eligible to receive a 7Firearm Owner's Identification Card. Nothing in this Section 8shall prohibit the Illinois State Police from denying an 9application for or revoking a Firearm Owner's Identification 10Card as provided by law. 11    (g) There may be only one discharge and dismissal under 12this Section. If a person is convicted of any offense which 13occurred within 5 years subsequent to a discharge and 14dismissal under this Section, the discharge and dismissal 15under this Section shall be admissible in the sentencing 16proceeding for that conviction as evidence in aggravation.17    (h) For purposes of this Section, "violent offense" means 18any offense in which bodily harm was inflicted or force was 19used against any person or threatened against any person; any 20offense involving the possession of a firearm or dangerous 21weapon; any offense involving sexual conduct, sexual 22penetration, or sexual exploitation; violation of an order of 23protection, stalking, hate crime, domestic battery, or any 24offense of domestic violence.25    (i) (Blank). 26(Source: P.A. 103-370, eff. 7-28-23; 103-702, eff. 1-1-25;   HB5583- 8 -LRB104 17432 RLC 30857 b1103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 104-398, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 28-15-25.) 3    (730 ILCS 5/5-6-3.6-1 new)4    Sec. 5-6-3.6-1. Mental health crisis consideration for 5firearm-related offenses.6    (a) In cases involving a firearm-related offense, the 7court shall consider diversion to treatment, including 8eligibility for probation under Section 5-6-3.6, prior to 9imposing a sentence of incarceration if:10        (1) the conduct occurred during a documented mental 11    health crisis;12        (2) the defendant did not discharge the firearm, 13    threaten another person, or cause bodily harm; and14        (3) the defendant cooperated with law enforcement.15    (b) Documentation of a mental health crisis may include, 16but is not limited to:17        (1) hospital or emergency medical records;18        (2) voluntary admission to a mental health facility;19        (3) evaluations by licensed mental health 20    professionals; or21        (4) other reliable clinical evidence.22    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require 23diversion or probation in any case involving violence, threats 24of violence, or use of a firearm against another person.    HB5583- 9 -LRB104 17432 RLC 30857 b1    (730 ILCS 5/5-6-3.6-2 new)2    Sec. 5-6-3.6-2. Retroactive review of First Time Weapon 3Offense Program eligibility.4    (a) A person convicted of a firearm-related offense prior 5to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 6General Assembly may petition the sentencing court for review 7if the person:8        (1) meets the eligibility criteria for probation under 9    Section 5-6-3.6; and10        (2) was denied access to the program established under 11    section 5-6-3.6 solely due to prosecutorial policy rather 12    than statutory ineligibility.13    (b) Upon review, the court may:14        (1) resentence the defendant under Section 5-6-3.6;15        (2) resentence the defendant to a term of supervision 16    or probation; or17        (3) order such other relief as justice requires, 18    consistent with public safety.19    (c) Relief under this Section shall be granted only upon 20written findings by the court and shall not apply to offenses 21involving violence, discharge of a firearm, or bodily harm.  22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.